lexicon.lexc
LEXICON ADVInter_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVInter_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter                                                   !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreadverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter                                                   !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_Stems
aandi ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aandi:aandiw2 ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aanii ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin% apii ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin% danaa ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin% dash ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin% iwapii ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniin% minik ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniindi:aaniindiw2 ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniish ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;
aaniish% apii ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter, Class: ADVInter                                  !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter, Class: ADVInter                                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter, Class: ADVInter                                  !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVInter, Class: ADVInter, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other      !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVInter_Class=ADVInter_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+ADVInter: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc                                                     !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVLoc_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc                                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreadverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc                                                     !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Stems
aabitawikana:aabitawikanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aabitawoonag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aajisag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aasamaatig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aasamayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aazhawayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aazhookana:aazhookanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaamakiing ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaamayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaami-ziibi:agaami-ziibiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaaming ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agidaabik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agidajiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agidigamig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agijayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamaabik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamaandag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamaki:anaamakiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaami-jiimaan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamidaabaan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamiindim ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamiskwam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ashidagaam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasajiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasew ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasi-baawitig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasigakiiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasisag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
bagwaj-aya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
besho:beshow2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biindaagipikwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinjaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinji-waazh ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinjidaw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinjimisad ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinjipwaagan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
dabasaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
dibishkookamig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eko-nising ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyedawigaad ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyedawinik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyedawitawag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawigam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawininj ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawizid ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
gabaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
gakiiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
giiwitaa-ayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
giiwitaawi-zaaga'igan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
imaa ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ishkwe-ayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ishpaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
iwidi:iwidiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigaagonag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigagam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigewe-ziibi:jiigewe-ziibiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigi-baawitig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigi-zaaga'igan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigidaabaanikana:jiigidaabaanikanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigisag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigitawag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
megwayaak ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
michaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mishawagaam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mishawikwam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mitaamik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mizhishawaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naage% waasa:naage% waasaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawaajiwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawagaam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawi-gichigami:naawi-gichigamiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawi-ziibi:naawi-ziibiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawikana:naawikanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawishkode ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawoodena:naawoodenaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nake ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nasawaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
niisaaki:niisaakiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
niisisag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nisawaajiwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nisawi-desabiwin ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nitam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
o'omaa ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogidaagonag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogidaawigan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogiidaajiwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogijidaabaan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ondaasishkode ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
owidi:owidiw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
wagijaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
wekwaagam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
zhagashkaanaamik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
zhishwajigamig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
